Arkansas, session 2025, SB307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-3-201(a), concerning requirements for
new construction or operation of equipment or facilities, is amended to read
as follows:
(a) New construction or operation of equipment or facilities that are
located within this state for supplying a public service or the extension of
a public service within this state shall not be undertaken without first
obtaining from the Arkansas Public Service Commission a certificate that
public convenience and necessity require or will require the construction or
operation within this state.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-3-201(b), concerning when a certificate
*ANS209*
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
of public convenience is not required, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(3)(A) A public utility shall provide notice to the commission
of the public utility's intent to recover any strategic investments that are
subject to this subchapter through a rider under the Generating Arkansas Jobs
Act of 2025, § 23-4-1301 et seq. as part of the public utility's application
under this subchapter.
(B) To the extent a member cooperative of a generation and
transmission cooperative is exempt from the requirement to obtain a
certificate of public convenience and necessity under subsection (b) of this
section, the exemption shall extend to the generation and transmission
cooperative.
(C) An exemption claimed by a public utility under this
section or under § 23-18-504(a)(5) does not bar:
(i) The public utility from voluntarily seeking the
issuance of a certificate of public convenience and necessity under this
section; or
(ii) The commission from:
(a) Granting the public utility the
certificate of public convenience and necessity sought under subdivision
(d)(1) of this section; and
(b) Allowing the public utility to seek
recovery of the reasonable cost of the equipment or facilities through rates.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-3-201, concerning requirements for a
certificate of public convenience and necessity, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(e) As used in this section:
(1) "Generation and transmission cooperative" means the same as
defined in § 23-4-1101;
(2) "Major utility facility" means the same as defined in § 23-
18-503; and
(3) "Strategic investments" means the same as defined in § 23-4-
1303.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 3, Subchapter 2, is amended
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-3-207. Issuance of certificate of public convenience and necessity.
(a) If the Arkansas Public Service Commission determines that granting
a certificate of public convenience and necessity is consistent with the
public interest, the commission shall enter an order granting a certificate
of public convenience and necessity within six (6) months after the public
utility submits an application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity.
(b)(1) If the commission determines that granting a certificate of
public convenience and necessity is not in the public interest, the
commission shall enter an order denying the certificate of public convenience
and necessity.
(2) In the order entered by the commission under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section, the commission shall discuss:
(A) The basis for the commission's findings; and
(B) Any evidence or other information submitted by the
public utility as part of its notice or application that the commission deems
to be insufficient.
(3)(A) If a public utility submits additional evidence or other
information to the commission demonstrating that the strategic investments,
as defined in § 23-4-1303, that are subject to this subchapter are
reasonable, necessary, and in the public interest, then the commission shall
enter an order granting the certificate of public convenience and necessity
within thirty (30) days after the date of the public utility’s filing.
(B) If the commission finds that the strategic investments
that are subject to this subchapter are not reasonable, necessary, or in the
public interest, the commission shall enter an order denying the certificate
of public convenience and necessity.
(C) In the order issued under subdivision (b)(3)(B) of
this section, the commission shall discuss:
(i) The basis for the commission's findings; and
(ii) Any evidence or other information submitted by
the public utility as part of its notice or application that the commission
deems to be insufficient.
(D) The process outlined in subdivisions (b)(3)(B) and (C)
of this section may continue until the commission finds that:
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(i) The public utility's application complies with
this subchapter;
(ii) The public utility withdraws its application;
or
(iii) The public utility appeals the commission's
decision under § 23-2-423.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-4-901, concerning definitions used under
a rate case by the Arkansas Public Service Commission, is amended to add
additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(5) "Notice" means a written form document, not an application,
that contains only as much information as is needed to provide the necessary
information to the commission and member-consumers as is specifically
required under this subchapter; and
(6) "Rate case procedures" means the administrative procedures
and requirements normally required by a co-op when adjusting rates and
charges under §§ 23-4-402, 23-4-405, 23-4-407 — 23-4-418, 23-4-422, and 23-4-
620 — 23-4-634 or other applicable statutes and rules of the commission.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-4-902 is amended to read as follows:
23-4-902. Exemption from rate case procedures, etc.
A co-op, as defined in § 23-4-901, shall not be subject to rate case
procedures and hearings and other requirements of §§ 23-4-402 — 23-4-405, 23-
4-407 — 23-4-418, and 23-4-620 — 23-4-634 and Arkansas Public Service
Commission rules implementary thereof, hereafter referred to as “rate case
procedures”, by the commission Arkansas Public Service Commission unless:
(1) By action of its board of directors, the co-op elects to be
subject to rate case procedures by the commission;
(2) A proposed change in the co-op's rates and charges exceeds
ten percent (10%) of total gross revenues;
(3) Ten percent (10%) of the co-op's member-consumers petition
the commission to apply rate case procedures, and the commission notifies the
co-op that the commission will initiate an investigation and may apply rate
case procedures if the commission determines that there is substantial
evidence indicating that rates and charges are unreasonable; or
(4) As otherwise provided in this subchapter.
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 23-4-903 is amended to read as follows:
23-4-903. Notification of proposed rate change.
(a) Each co-op not subject to rate case procedures, at least ninety
(90) days before the effective date of any proposed rate change, shall notify
the Arkansas Public Service Commission and each of its member-consumers of
the proposed rate change. Notice to the commission shall include a verified
statement showing the then total number of member-consumers of the co-op.
Notice by the co-op to its member-consumers shall:
(1) Be in a notice form prescribed by the commission;
(2) Be by regular mail and may be included in regular member-
consumer billings or in regularly published co-op newsletters provided to its
member-consumers; and
(3) Include a schedule of the proposed rate change, the
effective date of the proposed rate change, and the procedure necessary for
the member-consumers to petition the commission to apply rate case
procedures; and
(4) Not require a new cost-of-service study, application for
approval, or additional rate case procedure requirement.
(b) The commission shall not require or establish additional notice or
filing requirements for a co-op that is adjusting the co-op's rates and
charges under this subchapter and shall certify whether the co-op met the
notice requirements set forth in this subchapter.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 23-4-905 is amended to read as follows:
23-4-905. Petition for relief from rate change — Effect.
(a)(1) If, by the effective date of the proposed change in rates and
charges, the Arkansas Public Service Commission has received petitions from
fewer than fifteen percent (15%) ten percent (10%) of the member-consumers
requesting that the commission apply rate case procedures, then the
commission shall immediately certify that fact to the co-op.
(2) The proposed rates and charges shall become effective as
published in the notice to the member-consumers.
(b) Rates and charges so established shall be in effect for not less
than one (1) year, subject to the procedure provided for in § 23-4-906. If,
on or before the effective date of the proposed change in rates and charges,
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
the commission has received petitions from ten percent (10%) of the member-
consumers, then the commission shall notify the co-op that it will initiate
an investigation and may apply rate case procedures under § 23-4-908.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 23-4-907 is amended to read as follows:
23-4-907. Commission's jurisdiction not affected.
Sections 23-4-902, 23-4-903, 23-4-905, and 23-4-906, 23-4-908, and 23-
4-909 apply only to rates and charges and shall have no effect on the
Arkansas Public Service Commission's jurisdiction over a co-op as otherwise
provided by law.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 23-4-908 is amended to read as follows:
23-4-908. Authority of commission.
(a) The Upon receipt of a sufficient number of valid petitions under §
23-4-905, the Arkansas Public Service Commission shall have the authority to
investigate and determine the reasonableness of the change in rates and
charges of each co-op changing its rates and charges pursuant to this
subchapter, within one (1) year of the time of the change in rates and
charges.
(b) If the commission preliminarily determines that there is
substantial evidence indicating that the rates and charges are unreasonable,
the commission shall have the authority to apply rate case procedures.
(c)(1) After a hearing thereon, the commission shall have the
authority to modify all or any portion of the changes found to be
unreasonable.
(2) If, following the hearing, the commission orders a change in
the co-op's rates and charges, the co-op shall not effect a subsequent change
in rates and charges pursuant to this subchapter for a period of twelve (12)
months from the date of the commission order.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 23-4-909 is amended to read as follows:
23-4-909. Apportionment of rates and charges.
(a) Upon receipt of a sufficient number of valid petitions under § 23-
4-905, the Arkansas Public Service Commission may inquire into the
reasonableness of the apportionment of rates and charges by a co-op.
(b) When determining how rates and charges established under § 23-4-
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
903 are to be allocated among different rate classes, a co-op shall endeavor
to apportion the rates and charges in a manner which reflects consistent
with, as closely as practicable, the costs of providing service to each class
last approved cost-of-service study.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 23-4-1102 is amended to read as follows:
23-4-1102. Exemption from general rate case procedure.
A generation and transmission cooperative may modify its rates and
charges if:
(1) At least three-fourths (¾) of its board votes to change its
rates and charges, including a proposed change to cost allocation and rate
design of the generation and transmission cooperative;
(2) A proposed increase in the generation and transmission
cooperative's rates and charges does not exceed five percent (5%) in any
twelve-month period of the total gross revenues of the generation and
transmission cooperative; and
(3) Any additional requirements of this subchapter are
satisfied.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 23-4-1104(a)(2), concerning alternative
procedures for modifying rates and charges of a generation and transmission
cooperative, is amended to read as follows:
(2) In addition to an attachment containing the proposed tariffs
to effect the modification of the rates and charges, the application shall
provide the following:
(A) Proof of the board vote required by § 23-4-1102;
(B) The proof of notice required by § 23-4-1103;
(C) A current calculation of the generation and
transmission cooperative's:
(i) Times interest earned ratio;
(ii) Debt service coverage ratio; and
(iii) Margins as a percent of revenue for the last
available calendar year;
(D) An analysis of the impact of the proposed change in
rates and charges on each member cooperative's cost of wholesale power that
is acquired from the generation and transmission cooperative;
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(E) Documentary evidence that the impact of the proposed
change in rates and charges does not exceed five percent (5%) of the
generation and transmission cooperative's total gross revenues for the
previous calendar year twelve-month period before the generation and
transmission cooperative's notice under § 23-4-1103(a)(1);
(F) Documentation that shows the derivation of the
generation and transmission cooperative's proposed changes in its rates and
charges; and
(G)(i) Any other supporting documentation or evidence
required by the commission to validate the requirements of this subchapter.
(ii)(a) However, the commission shall not require
the generation and transmission cooperative to prepare a cost-of-service
study.
(b) Instead In lieu of voluntarily filing a
new cost-of-service study for approval, the generation and transmission
cooperative shall rely upon the most recent commission-approved cost
allocation.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 23-4-1105(a), concerning the application
for modification of retail rates, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A member cooperative may propose a modification of its retail
rates and charges to incorporate the proposed change in the generation and
transmission cooperative's wholesale rates and charges filed under § 23-4-
1104 if:
(1) The member cooperative files its application for a
modification of its retail rates and charges with the Arkansas Public Service
Commission on the same within ten (10) days from the date as the generation
and transmission cooperative files its application for a modification of its
change in wholesale rates and charges under § 23-4-1104; and
(2) The member cooperative apportions its proposed change in
rates and charges in a manner that reflects, as closely as practicable, its
cost of providing service to each class.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 23-4-1106 is repealed.
23-4-1106. Limitation on increase in rates.
The generation and transmission cooperative shall not increase its
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
rates and charges under this subchapter by an aggregate total of more than
eight percent (8%) during any twenty-four-month period.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 4, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 13 — Generating Arkansas Jobs Act of 2025

23-4-1301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Generating
Arkansas Jobs Act of 2025".

23-4-1302. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Significant strategic investments in electric utility
infrastructure and natural gas utility infrastructure are necessary to enable
this state to:
(A) Attract and serve economic development projects across
a variety of industries;
(B) Continue reliable support for existing customers by
investing in additions of new electric utility infrastructure and natural gas
utility infrastructure to support growth; and
(C) Replace retiring electric generation facilities and
other electric utility infrastructure and natural gas utility infrastructure;
(2) Strategic investments to ensure that electric utilities have
adequate dispatchable generation resources to support reliable service for
their customers continue to be a significant element in enabling this state
to attract and serve these economic development opportunities;
(3) Strategic investments in electric utility infrastructure and
natural gas utility infrastructure are needed to support the development of
sites designated as available for economic development projects, as these
sites are critical to this state’s economic development efforts;
(4) While Arkansas's electric utilities have pursued beneficial
resource acquisition opportunities for their customers, most will need to
construct new electric generating facilities in the near future;
(5) Further strategic investments in electric utility
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
infrastructure are needed to support the license extension for existing
nuclear generation resources and ensure that electric utilities maintain
adequate dispatchable generation resources to support reliable service for
their customers;
(6) Supporting the continued evaluation of modular reactors and
advanced nuclear technologies to identify opportunities to pursue strategic
investments in those advanced nuclear technologies if it is in the public
interest in considering whether or not those advanced nuclear technologies
become technically feasible, commercially viable, and financially viable or
otherwise beneficial to customers in Arkansas;
(7) Economic development projects and the continued provision of
reliable electric utility service and reliable natural gas utility service
are essential to the future of Arkansas;
(8) Failure to act now will result in the state's missing
transformational opportunities for economic development, including new
business opportunities as well as the expansion of existing businesses that
may not be available again for many years to come;
(9) These prospective and existing businesses are prepared to
invest in electric utility infrastructure and natural gas utility
infrastructure in this state and will provide employment for Arkansas
residents that will benefit the public interest;
(10) These prospective strategic investments and the resulting
employment and workforce development opportunities for this state will
produce investment, economic growth and activity, and new state and local tax
revenue that will strengthen communities throughout this state and will
enhance the state’s overall economic vitality and well-being;
(11) Existing regulatory frameworks for electric utilities and
natural gas utilities are inadequate and were not designed to enable the
electric utilities and the natural gas utilities to respond timely and make
the required level of strategic investments in electric utility or natural
gas utility infrastructure and the associated expenses, in addition to
maintaining the financial viability necessary to support strategic
investments requiring new infrastructure to serve the residents of Arkansas;
(12) Regulatory reform is required to keep pace with the
evolving industry and help ensure that electric utilities and natural gas
utilities are financially sound and able to make the strategic investments to
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
continue providing customers safe, reliable, affordable, and sustainable
electric utility service and natural gas utility service;
(13) To support economic development in Arkansas, nothing herein
is intended to develop rates that would unreasonably shift costs from a
customer or customer class to other customers in a manner that would result
in rates that are not just and reasonable, not consistent with applicable
law, or not in the public interest;
(14) It is the policy of this state to maintain adequate
capacity of available, reliable, dispatchable, affordable, and resilient
electric generation to provide for the existing and reasonably projected
future energy consumption needs of all consumers of electricity in Arkansas;
(15) Arkansas can support a multitude of potential electric
generating resources and fuel supply resources so as to be the national
leader in the production of reliable and affordable energy in all forms that
make sense and are technically feasible, commercially viable, and financially
viable or otherwise beneficial to customers in Arkansas and the Arkansas
Public Service Commission shall ensure that generation resources will
maintain or improve the affordability, adequacy, and reliability of the
electric grid in Arkansas;
(16) Strategic investments will support the expansion of
Arkansas’s natural gas production capacity that will lead to economic growth
and employment opportunities in that business sector and will support the
continued development and use of Arkansas’s natural resources; and
(17) Strategic investments will enhance the capacity,
reliability, and resiliency of Arkansas’s electric and natural gas utility
infrastructure, which will support the reliability and resiliency of
Arkansas’s overall utility infrastructure and reliable electric and natural
gas utility service during extreme temperatures and other weather conditions
and during other periods of high demand and usage.

23-4-1303. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Construction work in progress" means:
(i) Materials costs;
(ii) Labor costs;
(iii) Labor costs adders;
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(iv) Costs associated with third-party vendors and
consultants;
(v) Costs associated with procurement of real
property rights;
(vi) Costs associated with securing all necessary
approvals;
(vii) Taxes;
(viii) Tax gross-up charges;
(ix) Capital suspense charges; and
(x) Overheads for any strategic investments that are
not yet complete or in service.
(B) "Construction work in progress" includes costs that
are:
(i) Recorded under the requirements of the uniform
system of accounts adopted by the Arkansas Public Service Commission by rule
and any applicable accounting guidance issued by the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission that are adopted by the Arkansas Public Service
Commission by rule; and
(ii) In conformance with generally accepted
accounting principles;
(2) "Electric distribution cooperative" means a rural electric
cooperative that sells electricity at retail and is a member of an electric
generation and transmission cooperative;
(3) "Electric generation and transmission cooperative" means a
rural electric cooperative formed under the Electric Cooperative Corporation
Act, § 23-18-301 et seq., that:
(A) Does not have a certificated service territory; and
(B) Exclusively sells electricity at wholesale;
(4) "Investor-owned electric utility" means a public utility
that is engaged in generating, transmitting, delivering, or furnishing
electricity to or for the public for compensation and that is owned by
investors and is not a cooperative;
(5) "Investor-owned natural gas utility" means a public utility
that is engaged in the production, transport, delivery, or furnishing of
natural gas to or for the public for compensation and that is owned by
investors and is not a cooperative;
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(6) "Major utility facility" means the same as defined in § 23-
18-503;
(7) "Public utility" means the same as defined in § 23-1-101;
(8) "Rider" means a rate schedule approved by the Arkansas
Public Service Commission to recover one (1) or more strategic investments
and the recovery costs that are not included in other rates or rate schedules
approved by the Arkansas Public Service Commission;
(9) "Rider test period" means a historical test period under §
23-4-406 which shall include adjustments identified by the electric utility
or the natural gas utility to a historical test period to reflect the effects
on an annualized basis of a change in circumstances which may occur within
twelve (12) months after the end of the historical test year where the
changes are reasonably known and measurable;
(10)(A) "Strategic investments" means investments, either
construction or purchase, and associated operating expenses made by a
electric public utility or natural gas public utility, and approved by the
Arkansas Public Service Commission under § 23-3-201 et seq., the Utility
Facility Environmental and Economic Protection Act, § 23-18-501 et seq., or a
notice under § 23-18-104 or as otherwise stated in subdivision (10)(B) of
this section, to:
(i) Support growth and economic development in this
state, including supporting the development of sites designated as available
for economic development;
(ii) Maintain and improve the provision of reliable
electric utility service and natural gas utility service to new and existing
customers in this state;
(iii) Support the license extension for existing
nuclear generation resources; and
(iv) Ensure that electric utilities maintain
adequate dispatchable generation resources to support reliable service for
their customers that is consistent with the resource adequacy requirements
established by the applicable load balancing authority.
(B) "Strategic investments" includes without limitation
investments and associated operating expenses associated with:
(i) A new electric generating facility, an
associated transportation and storage facility for fuel, and other facilities
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
designed for or capable of operation at a capacity of one hundred megawatts
(100 MW) or more for a single facility;
(ii) An energy storage facility designed for or
capable of operating at a capacity of fifty megawatts (50 MW) or more for a
single facility or a combination of energy storage facilities and an electric
generating facility designed for or capable of operation at a combined
capacity of one hundred megawatts (100 MW) or more for a single facility to
provide service to new and existing customers located in Arkansas;
(iii) Upgrades, expansions, or fuel conversions of
existing electric generating facilities and associated transportation and
storage facilities for fuel and other facilities, energy storage facilities,
or any combination thereof to sustain or increase capacity and, therefore,
improve reliability, to provide service to new and existing customers in
Arkansas;
(iv) New electric transmission facilities, including
substations with a design voltage of more than one hundred kilovolts (100 kV)
or more to provide service to new and existing customers located in Arkansas;
(v) Upgrades or expansions of existing electric
transmission facilities, including substations with a design voltage of more
than one hundred kilovolts (100 kV) or more to increase capacity, therefore,
improve reliability to provide service to new and existing customers located
in Arkansas;
(vi) New natural gas transmission lines or high
pressure distribution lines with a maximum allowable operating pressure of
one hundred twenty-five pounds per square inch gauge (125 PSIG) or greater
and natural gas storage facilities;
(vii) Upgrades or expansions of existing natural gas
transmission lines, high pressure distribution lines with a maximum allowable
operating pressure of one hundred twenty-five pounds per square inch gauge
(125 PSIG) or greater and natural gas storage facilities; and
(viii) Feasibility studies of strategic investments
and advanced energy technologies, as defined in § 23-4-1308, including site
studies and due diligence to determine construction estimates.
(C)(i) A renewable resource strategic investment shall be
eligible for recovery through the rider under this section, if the Arkansas
Public Service Commission finds in a proceeding under § 23-3-201 et seq., §
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
23-18-104, the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic Protection Act, §
23-18-501 et seq., or any other proceeding for approval of a renewable
resource strategic investment based on substantial evidence, that a renewable
resource strategic investment results in benefits to customers and the
electric utility would continue to have adequate dispatchable resources to
provide reliable service to its customers consistent with the resource
adequacy requirements of the load balancing authority with the addition of
the renewable strategic investment.
(ii) As used in subdivision (10)(C)(i) of this
section, "benefits" shall include without limitation:
(a) The cost of the renewable strategic
investment is reasonable and prudently incurred;
(b) The renewable resource strategic
investment is necessary to supplement or replace the electric utility's
existing generation resources;
(c) The renewable resource strategic
investment provides energy and capacity benefits;
(d) The renewable resource provides generation
resource mix diversification and fuel source mix benefits and risk mitigation
benefits;
(e) The renewable resource strategic
investment supports efforts to attract or retain economic development
opportunities for this state; or
(f) A customer or customers contract to pay
all or a portion of the cost of the strategic investment as a resource
through a special rate contract, a renewable rate schedule, a contribution in
aid of construction, or other form of payment.
(D) Wind resources located in Arkansas are not eligible
for recovery through a rider under this subchapter; and
(11) "Times interest earned ratio" means earnings before
interest and taxes divided by the total interest payable on bonds and other
debt.

23-4-1304. Authorization to recover strategic investments through
rider — Investor-owned electric utility and investor-owned natural gas
utility.
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(a) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural
gas utility may use a rider to recover strategic investments that are not
otherwise recoverable through rates that were previously approved by the
Arkansas Public Service Commission or charged by the investor-owned electric
utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility after:
(1) A commission order approving an application under § 23-3-201
et seq. or the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic Protection Act, §
23-18-501 et seq., or a notice under § 23-18-104; or
(2) A commission order approving any other application related
to the siting or prudence of the decision to invest in the new strategic
investments.
(b)(1) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural
gas utility may elect to file with the commission a rider to recover
strategic investments that are not included in rates.
(2) The investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned
natural gas utility shall provide notice to the Attorney General of the
filing of the rider by the investor-owned electric utility or the investor-
owned natural gas utility on the date the investor-owned electric utility or
the investor-owned natural gas utility files the rider with the commission.
(c)(1) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural
gas utility may select the date of the first annual filing update, with all
subsequent updates to be filed on or by the same day annually as the first
filing update.
(2) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned
natural gas utility shall provide notice to the Attorney General of the
filing of the rider on the date the investor-owned electric utility or the
investor-owned natural gas utility files each annual update to the rider with
the commission.
(d) For a rider under this subchapter, an investor-owned electric
utility or an investor-owned natural gas utility shall use a rider test
period.
(e)(1) Upon receipt of an investor-owned electric utility's or an
investor-owned natural gas utility’s filing to implement the rider rate
schedule and each annual update under this subchapter, the commission shall
issue an order approving the rider rate schedule and each annual update to
recover strategic investments under this subchapter if the commission
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
determines that the investor-owned electric utility's or the investor-owned
natural gas utility’s application complies with the provisions of this
section.
(2)(A) Unless the commission determines that approving the
investor-owned electric utility's or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s
application for the rider and each annual update does not comply with this
subchapter, the commission shall enter an order within ninety (90) calendar
days following the date of the investor-owned electric utility's or the
investor-owned natural gas utility’s filing.
(B)(i) If the commission determines that approving an
application for approval of a rider rate schedule or annual update under this
subchapter does not comply with this section, the commission shall enter an
order denying the application.
(ii) In the order entered by the commission under
subdivision (e)(2)(B)(i) of this section, the commission shall discuss:
(a) The basis for the commission's findings;
and
(b) Any evidence or other information
submitted by the investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned
natural gas utility as part of its application that the commission deems to
be insufficient.
(C) Each annual update shall include, for the initial
rider test year, the construction work in progress costs that will ultimately
be capitalized on which the utility will earn a return, amounts that would
otherwise be recorded as allowance for funds used during construction, and
any expenses associated with the construction work in progress that will not
be capitalized.
(D) The commission shall verify the amounts included in
each annual update reflect the amounts authorized for recovery under the
Generating Arkansas Jobs Act of 2025, § 23-4-1301 et seq.
(E) The commission shall complete its review of each
annual update filing and issue its order within sixty (60) days following the
date of the annual update filing.
(F)(i) If the investor-owned electric utility or the
investor-owned natural gas utility submits an amended filing remedying the
areas of noncompliance identified by the commission in its order, the
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
commission shall enter an order approving the application within ten (10)
calendar days following the date of the amended filing unless the commission
finds that the filing does not comply with the provisions of this subchapter.
(ii) If the commission finds that the amended filing
does not remedy the areas of noncompliance, the commission shall enter an
order denying the application.
(iii) In the order issued under subdivision
(e)(2)(F)(ii) of this section, the commission shall discuss:
(a) The basis for the commission's findings;
and
(b) Any evidence or other information
submitted by the investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned
natural gas utility as part of its notice or application that the commission
deems to be insufficient.
(G) The process outlined in subdivision (e)(2)(B) and (F)
of this section may continue until the commission finds that:
(i) The investor-owned electric utility's or the
investor-owned natural gas utility's application complies with this
subchapter; or
(ii) The investor-owned electric utility or the
investor-owned natural gas utility withdraws its application or appeals the
commission's decision under § 23-2-423.
(H) If the commission fails to issue its order within the
timeframes stated in this section, the investor-owned electric utility's
filing or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s filing shall become
effective by operation of law subject to completion of the commission's
review under this subchapter.
(f)(1) At the election of the investor-owned electric utility or the
investor-owned natural gas utility, strategic investments shall be recovered
through the rider, separate from the investor-owned electric utility's or the
investor-owned natural gas utility’s formula rate plan implemented under the
Formula Rate Review Act, § 23-4-1201 et seq., any other rider, or otherwise
as part of the investor-owned electric utility's or the investor-owned
natural gas utility's rates approved by the commission.
(2) If elected by an investor-owned electric utility or an
investor-owned natural gas utility, the rider shall remain in effect under
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
this subchapter until the investor-owned electric utility or the investor-
owned natural gas utility decides to withdraw the rider with respect to
future cost recovery for strategic investments to be made after the date of
the withdrawal.
(g) For the purposes of calculating rates to recover the costs of
strategic investments, including rates implemented through an individual
customer contract, the commission shall ensure that the rates charged to
customers recover the costs of strategic investments in a manner that is
consistent with applicable law and in the public interest.
(h)(1) An amount collected through the rider under this subchapter
shall be collected subject to refunds pending the completion of the
commission's review under this subchapter.
(2) At any time during the process, if the commission finds that
any costs were not prudently incurred, the commission shall order that the
costs that were not prudently incurred be refunded to customers through bill
credits.
(i) The rider elected by an investor-owned electric utility or an
investor-owned natural gas utility under this subchapter to recover strategic
investments is a revenue requirement rider and shall provide return on
construction work in progress plus operating expenses during construction and
return on rate base plus operating expenses once complete and in service.
(j)(1) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural
gas utility shall not accrue an allowance for funds used during construction
for strategic investments with costs recovered through the rider.
(2) Instead, the commission shall authorize an investor-owned
electric utility or an investor-owned natural gas utility to earn a return
through the rider under this subchapter on any construction work in progress.
(k) The commission shall authorize an investor-owned electric utility
or an investor-owned natural gas utility to recover through the rider filed
under this subchapter any expenses associated with the construction of
strategic investments that will not be capitalized.
(l) In calculating construction work in progress, including actual
costs and any projections, the investor-owned electric utility or the
investor-owned natural gas utility shall base all amounts on year-end
information not subject to averaging beginning-of-year or end-of-year
balances.
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(m)(1)(A) During the construction of strategic investments included in
the rider, an investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural
gas utility shall include in the capital structure only short-term debt,
long-term debt, and equity.
(B) The investor-owned electric utility or the investor-
owned natural gas utility shall base the balances of those items under
subdivision (m)(1)(A) of this section on the investor-owned electric
utility’s or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s actual capital
structure with a minimum equity percentage of thirty percent (30%) and a
maximum equity percentage of fifty percent (50%).
(C) During the construction of strategic investments, the
commission shall not require an investor-owned electric utility or an
investor-owned natural gas utility that is electing to utilize a rider under
this subchapter to include in the capital structure of the rider other items,
including current, accrued, or other liabilities or accumulated deferred
income taxes.
(D) For the purposes of the rider, the cost of debt used
in calculating the cost of capital shall be the cost of short-term debt and
the cost of long-term debt approved in the investor-owned electric utility’s
or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s most recent general rate case
proceeding or formula rate plan annual filing.
(2) For any strategic investment included in the rider under
this section that is complete and in service, the investor-owned electric
utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility shall use the capital
structure and overall rate of return that was approved in the investor-owned
electric utility’s or the investor-owned natural gas utility's most recent
general rate case proceeding or annual formula rate plan filing.
(n) For the purpose of the rider, the return on equity used in
calculating the cost of capital shall be set at the return on equity approved
in the investor-owned electric utility's or the investor-owned natural gas
utility’s most recent general rate case proceeding.
(o)(1) On the strategic investments' being complete and in service,
the commission shall authorize the investor-owned electric utility or the
investor-owned natural gas utility to earn a fair and reasonable return
through the rider on any capitalized costs for the strategic investments.
(2) Once the strategic investments go into service, the
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
commission shall authorize the investor-owned electric utility or the
investor-owned natural gas utility to recover through the rider any on-going
expenses associated with the strategic investments.
(3) In the investor-owned electric utility's or the investor-
owned natural gas utility’s next general rate case proceeding, the commission
shall allow the investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned natural
gas utility to include any capitalized amounts and associated expenses for
completed strategic investments in its base rates.
(4)(A) In the investor-owned electric utility's or the investor-
owned natural gas utility's next general rate case proceeding, the investor-
owned electric utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility shall move
any amounts for any completed strategic investments from the rider into base
rates.
(B) The investor-owned electric utility or the investor-
owned natural gas utility shall continue to recover through the rider
implemented under this subchapter the costs and expenses associated with any
strategic investments that are not complete and in service.
(p) The revenues from the rider shall be included in calculating the
maximum amount of revenue increase or decrease under § 23-4-1207(d) for any
formula rate plan implemented under the Formula Rate Review Act, § 23-4-1201
et seq., but shall otherwise be excluded from the revenues included in a
formula rate plan under the Formula Rate Review Act, § 23-4-1201 et seq., for
an investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural gas utility.
(q)(1) For any excess accumulated deferred income tax associated with
strategic investments, the commission shall:
(A) Authorize the investor-owned electric utility or
investor-owned natural gas utility to apply the excess deferred income taxes
to offset the investor-owned electric utility's or investor-owned natural gas
utility’s rate base used in calculating its rates; or
(B) Apply the excess deferred income taxes as a credit to
customer bills.
(2) The commission shall determine which form and the timing of
applying the accumulated deferred income taxes under subsection (q) of this
section is in the public interest.
(r) The commission shall authorize the investor-owned electric utility
or the investor-owned natural gas utility to monetize or apply any tax
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
credits or other tax incentives, including without limitation investment tax
credits and production tax credits, where possible to reduce the cost of
constructing or acquiring any strategic investments to benefit customers of
an investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural gas utility.
(s)(1) The investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned
natural gas utility shall seek federal funds and loan programs to reduce the
cost of constructing, acquiring, and financing strategic investments if
possible, appropriate, and available to reduce the cost of constructing or
acquiring any strategic investments.
(2) If an investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned
natural gas utility requests and receives federal funding to support
constructing or acquiring strategic investments, the applicable amount of
federal funding shall be deducted from the value of the strategic investments
that are capitalized and recoverable through rates charged to customers of an
investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural gas utility.
(t)(1) If an investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned
natural gas utility, with rates regulated under the Formula Rate Review Act,
§ 23-4-1201 et seq., has a return on equity above the return on the investor-
owned electric utility's or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s most
recent general rate case proceeding, plus five-tenths percent (0.5%), and
would otherwise be required to provide credits to a customer's bill, the
investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility
shall not be required to adjust rates and provide credits to customers that
may otherwise be required under § 23-4-1207(b) if the investor-owned electric
utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility has strategic investments
under construction in an amount equal to or greater than the amount above the
return on equity approved in the investor-owned electric utility's or the
investor-owned natural gas utility’s most recent general rate case
proceeding, plus five-tenths percent (0.5%).
(2) For an investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned
natural gas utility, with rates regulated under the Formula Rate Review Act,
§ 23-4-1201 et seq., the commission shall not require a reduction of rates to
the investor-owned electric utility's or the investor-owned natural gas
utility’s authorized rate of return, or reduce the investor-owned electric
utility's or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s target rate of return
under § 23-4-1207(b) for any formula rate plan mechanism under the Formula
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
Rate Review Act, § 23-4-1201 et seq., if an investor-owned electric utility
or an investor-owned natural gas utility has strategic investments under
construction in an amount equal to or greater than the level of earnings
above the investor-owned electric utility's or the investor-owned natural gas
utility’s authorized rate of return or the investor-owned electric utility's
or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s target rate of return under § 23-
4-1207(b) for any formula rate plan mechanism implemented under the Formula
Rate Review Act, § 23-4-1201 et seq.
(3)(A) The investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned
natural gas utility shall first apply any amounts identified in subdivisions
(t)(1) and (2) of this section to strategic investments under construction.
(B)(i) The commission may authorize the investor-owned
electric utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility to record any
amounts identified in subdivisions (t)(1) and (2) of this section and
designate those amounts to offset the cost of approved strategic investments
not yet under construction if the commission determines that doing so is in
the public interest.
(ii) If the commission authorizes recording any
amounts for the projects described in subdivision (t)(3)(B)(i) of this
section, the investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned natural
gas utility shall deduct interest at a rate equal to the cost of short-term
debt approved in the investor-owned electric utility's or the investor-owned
natural gas utility’s last general rate case proceeding from any amounts
recorded until those amounts are applied to offset the cost of strategic
investments.
(C) The investor-owned electric utility or the investor-
owned natural gas utility shall provide credits to customers equal to any
remaining amounts identified in subdivisions (t)(1) and (2) of this section
as required under § 23-4-1207(b), plus interest at a rate equal to the cost
of short-term debt approved in the investor-owned electric utility's or the
investor-owned natural gas utility's most recent general rate case proceeding
or annual formula rate plan filing.
(u) Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, this section does
not alter the powers and authority of the commission.
(v) A commission review of the expenditures associated with strategic
investments included in the rider, including evaluating whether or not any
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
costs or expenses are reasonable and prudently incurred, shall be completed
within twelve (12) calendar months after the date upon which the investor-
owned electric utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility provides
notice that the strategic investments are complete and in service.
(w) An expenditure associated with strategic investments for which an
application for approval is pending before the commission as of the effective
date of this subchapter shall be eligible for recovery through the rider
under this subchapter if:
(1) The costs are not otherwise included in rates approved by
the commission before the effective date of this subchapter;
(2) The investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned
natural gas utility has an application pending that was filed before the
effective date of this subchapter for approval:
(A) To construct a power generation facility outside of
the state under § 23-18-104;
(B) To obtain a certificate of environmental compatibility
and public need under the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic
Protection Act, § 23-18-501 et seq.;
(C) To obtain a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under § 23-3-201 et seq.; or
(D) For any other application related to the siting or
prudence of the decision to invest in the new strategic investments; and
(3) The commission enters an order after January 1, 2025,
approving an application that was filed before the effective date of this
subchapter for approval:
(A) To construct a power generation facility outside of
the state under § 23-18-104;
(B) To obtain a certificate of environmental compatibility
and public need under the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic
Protection Act, § 23-18-501 et seq.;
(C) To obtain a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under § 23-3-201 et seq.; or
(D) For any other application related to the siting or
prudence of the decision to invest in the new strategic investments.
(x)(1) If a customer pays or multiple customers pay for a portion of
any strategic investments through a contribution in aid of construction or
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
through other form of payment, the strategic investments shall continue to be
considered strategic investments and classified as part of the investor-owned
electric utility's or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s retail assets
and recoverable through the investor-owned electric utility's or the
investor-owned natural gas utility’s retail rates, either in the base rates
of the investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned natural gas
utility, through a rider under this subchapter, or rates otherwise approved
by the commission.
(2)(A) A payment by a customer or customers for any a portion of
any strategic investments through a contribution in aid of construction shall
be deducted from the cost of the strategic investments capitalized and
recovered through rates.
(B) A payment by a customer or customers through any other
forms of payment shall be recorded for ratemaking purposes, when the
strategic investments are first included in rates and shall be recognized as
payment over a period not to exceed the life of the strategic investments, in
a manner that provides comparable benefits for other customers over the life
of the strategic investments.

23-4-1305. Procedure to recover strategic investments through riders —
Investor-owned electric utility and investor-owned natural gas utility.
(a) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural
gas utility electing to file with the Arkansas Public Service Commission a
rider to recover strategic investments that are not otherwise included in
rates previously approved by the commission, may file an application to
implement the rider any time within twelve (12) months after:
(1) The commission enters an order approving an application
under § 23-3-201 et seq. or the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic
Protection Act, § 23-18-501 et seq., or a notice under § 23-18-104; or
(2) Any other application related to the siting or prudence of
the decision to invest in strategic investments.
(b) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural
gas utility shall file:
(1) An annual update to the rider to reflect the annual
expenditures;
(2) An update to any projections included in the rider to
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
recover strategic investments; and
(3) An investor-owned electric utility's or an investor-owned
natural gas utility’s recovery through the rider shall be limited to the
amounts identified by the investor-owned electric utility or an investor-
owned natural gas utility in the proceeding in which the commission approved
the strategic investments unless a greater amount is subsequently authorized
by the commission.
(c) The annual update required under subsection (b) of this section
shall include the information stated in subsections (a)-(b) of this section
for strategic investments following subsequent commission orders approving
strategic investments.
(d) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural
gas utility shall immediately notify the commission of any significant delays
or material changes in the construction schedule to include any strategic
investments that are abandoned before completion or for which construction
has been indefinitely suspended or material changes in costs of any strategic
investments recovered through the rider under this subsection (d).
(e)(1) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural
gas utility shall remove the cost of any strategic investments that are
abandoned before completion or for which construction has been indefinitely
suspended from the rider unless the commission determines, based on
substantial evidence provided by the investor-owned electric utility or the
investor-owned natural gas utility, that:
(A) The costs were reasonable and prudently incurred at
the time the costs were incurred;
(B) Continued recovery through the rider remains
reasonable;
(C) The circumstance of the abandonment before completion
or indefinite construction suspension is reasonable; and
(D) Recovery of those costs is in the public interest.
(2) Upon removal of any costs for strategic investments that are
abandoned before completion or for which construction has been indefinitely
suspended, the investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned natural
gas utility may seek recovery of those costs through rates if the commission
determines, based on substantial evidence provided by the investor-owned
electric utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility, that:
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(A) The costs were reasonable and prudently incurred at
the time those costs were incurred;
(B) The circumstance of the abandonment before completion
or indefinite construction suspension is reasonable; and
(C) Recovery of those costs is in the public interest.
(3)(A) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned
natural gas utility may request recovery of any costs for strategic
investments that are abandoned before completion or for which construction
has been indefinitely suspended if the costs for strategic investments that
are abandoned before completion or for which construction has been
indefinitely suspended are removed from recovery through the rider in a
separate proceeding.
(B) Upon receipt of a request for recovery of costs under
subdivision (e)(3)(A) of this section, the commission shall determine:
(i) Whether recovery of those costs is in the public
interest; and
(ii) The form and timing of recovery through rates
charged to customers.
(f)(1)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2)(D)(i) of this
section, an investor-owned electric utility's or an investor-owned natural
gas utility’s total amount of revenue increase from an annual update to the
rider under this subchapter shall not result in the investor-owned electric
utility's or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s rates exceeding a level
ten percent (10%) below the national average for all sectors.
(B) For this comparison, the rates under subdivision
(f)(1)(A) of this section shall be calculated using:
(i) The same method as that used by the United
States Energy Information Administration and published in its most recent
edition of the Electric Power Annual report for electric utilities, as
adopted by the commission by rule, or the Natural Gas Annual report for
natural gas utilities, as adopted by the commission by rule; and
(ii) Data from the same calendar year as the United
States Energy Information Administration's publication to which the investor-
owned electric utility's or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s revenue
increase is compared.
(C) If the commission finds that the investor-owned
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
electric utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility provides
substantial evidence to the commission demonstrating that its rates will
remain capable of attracting or retaining economic development opportunities
for the state even if the rates exceed ten percent (10%) below national
average and that doing so is in the public interest, then the commission
shall approve each revenue increase.
(2)(A) If the commission approves a revenue increase for an
investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural gas utility from
an annual update to the rider under this subchapter that results in the
investor-owned electric utility's or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s
rates exceeding a level ten percent (10%) below the national average, the
commission shall submit a letter to the cochairs of the Legislative Council
notifying the General Assembly that the commission has approved a revenue
increase for an investor-owned electric utility or investor-owned natural gas
utility from an annual update to the rider under this subchapter that has
resulted in an investor-owned electric utility's or an investor-owned natural
gas utility’s total rates inclusive of all riders is exceeding a level ten
percent (10%) below the national average.
(B) Unless the commission approves an increase in the
total amount of revenue increase from an annual update to the rider under
this subchapter that exceeds a level ten percent (10%) below the national
average for all sectors under subdivision (f)(2)(A) of this section, the
investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility
shall adjust its annual update to the rider under subsections (a)—(d) of this
section to include only a revenue increase that results in rates that are ten
percent (10%) below the national average.
(C) The commission shall verify that an annual update to
the rider under subsections (a)—(d) of this section does not include a
revenue increase that results in rates exceeding a level ten percent (10%)
below the national average unless it authorizes a greater amount under
subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section.
(D)(i) If an investor-owned natural gas utility’s rates
are above the national average for all sectors calculated using the same
method as that used by the United States Energy Information Administration
and published in its most recent edition of the Natural Gas Annual report for
natural gas utilities, as adopted by the commission by rule, and calculated
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
using data from the same calendar year as the United States Energy
Information Administration publication to which the investor-owned natural
gas utility’s revenue increase is compared, the total amount of revenue
increase or decrease for an investor-owned natural gas utility from an annual
update to the rider under this subchapter shall not exceed four percent (4%)
of each rate class's total revenue.
(ii) If a conflict exists between subdivision (f)(1)
of this section and subdivision (f)(2)(D)(i) of this section, subdivision
(f)(2)(D)(i) of this section shall control.
(E) The commission shall submit an annual report to the
Legislative Council describing:
(i) The strategic investments included in the rider
for an investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural gas
utility; and
(ii) The change in rates resulting from the
investor-owned electric utility's and the investor-owned natural gas
utility’s annual update to the rider under this subchapter on the investor-
owned electric utility's or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s rates.
(3) An investor-owned electric utility shall submit an annual
report to the commission describing its generation portfolio mix based on the
generation capacity mix and on the energy mix.
(4) The commission shall submit an annual report to the
Legislative Council describing the generation portfolio mix based on the
generation capacity mix and based on the energy mix for each investor-owned
electric utility.
(g) Once strategic investments in public utility facilities are
complete and in service, an investor-owned electric utility or an investor-
owned natural gas utility shall:
(1) Reconcile the actual expenditures and any projected amounts
included in the rider;
(2) Net any differences in projected amounts and actual
expenditures; and
(3) Either:
(A) Reduce the amounts ultimately capitalized by any over-
collection; or
(B) Recover any under-collection through subsequent years’
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
rider filings.
(h) For recovery through the rider, an investor-owned electric utility
or an investor-owned natural gas utility shall give priority to strategic
investments in new electric generation and transmission facilities located in
Arkansas, unless:
(1) The investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned
natural gas utility demonstrates, and the commission finds that a strategic
investment in new electric generation and transmission facilities located
outside of Arkansas provides greater benefits to the investor-owned electric
utility's or the investor-owned natural gas utility’s customers in Arkansas
than a comparable strategic investment in new electric generation and
transmission facilities located in Arkansas;
(2) A comparable strategic investment in new electric generation
or transmission facility is not available or cannot be constructed in
Arkansas; or
(3) A customer or customers contract to pay all or a portion of
the cost of the strategic investment in the resource through a special rate
contract, a renewable rate schedule, a contribution in aid of construction,
or other form of payment.

23-4-1306. Authorization to recover strategic investments through
rider – Electric distribution cooperative and electric generation and
transmission cooperative.
(a) An electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation and
transmission cooperative may obtain a rider to recover strategic investments
if not otherwise recoverable in rates previously approved by the Arkansas
Public Service Commission after:
(1) A commission order approving an application under § 23-3-201
et seq. or the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic Protection Act, §
23-18-501 et seq. or a notice under § 23-18-104; or
(2) A commission order approving any other application related
to the sighting or prudence of the decision to invest in the new strategic
investments.
(b)(1) An electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation
and transmission cooperative may elect to file with the commission a rider to
recover strategic investments that are not included in rates.
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(2) The electric distribution cooperative or the electric
generation and transmission cooperative shall provide notice to the Attorney
General of the filing of the rider by the electric distribution cooperative
or the electric generation and transmission cooperative on the date the
electric distribution cooperative or the electric generation and transmission
cooperative files the rider with the commission.
(c) An electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation and
transmission cooperative may select the date of the first annual filing
update, with all subsequent updates to be filed on or by the same day
annually as the first filing update.
(d) For a rider under this subchapter, an electric distribution
cooperative or an electric generation and transmission cooperative shall use
a rider test period.
(e)(1) Upon receipt of an electric distribution cooperative’s or an
electric generation and transmission cooperative's filing to implement the
rider rate schedule and each annual update under this subchapter, the
commission shall issue an order approving the rider rate schedule and each
annual update to recover strategic investments under this subchapter if the
commission determines that the electric distribution cooperative’s or the
electric generation and transmission cooperative’s application complies with
and therefore is in the public interest.
(2)(A) Unless the commission determines that approving the
electric distribution cooperative's or the electric generation and
transmission cooperative's application does not comply with this subchapter,
the commission shall enter an order within ninety (90) calendar days
following the date of the electric distribution cooperative's or the electric
generation and transmission cooperative’s filing.
(B)(i) If the commission determines that approving an
application does not comply with this section, the commission shall enter an
order denying the application.
(ii) In the order entered by the commission under
subdivision (e)(2)(B)(i) of this section, the commission shall discuss:
(a) The basis for the commission's findings;
and
(b) Any evidence or other information
submitted by the electric distribution cooperative or the electric generation
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
and transmission cooperative as part of its application that the commission
deems to be insufficient.
(C) Each annual update shall include, for the initial
rider test year, the construction work in progress costs that will ultimately
be capitalized on which the utility will earn a return, amounts that would
otherwise be recorded as allowance for funds used during construction, and
any expenses associated with the construction work in progress that will not
be capitalized.
(D) The commission shall verify the amounts included in
each annual update reflect the amounts authorized for recovery under the
Generating Arkansas Jobs Act of 2025, § 23-4-1301 et seq.
(E) The commission shall complete its review of each
annual update filing and issue its order within sixty (60) days following the
date of the annual update filing.
(F)(i) If the electric distribution cooperative or
electric generation and transmission cooperative submits an amended filing
remedying the areas of noncompliance identified by the commission in its
order, the commission shall enter an order approving the application within
ten (10) calendar days following the date of the amended filing unless the
commission finds that the filing does not comply with the provisions of this
subchapter.
(ii) If the commission finds that the amended filing
does not remedy the areas of noncompliance, the commission shall enter an
order denying the application.
(iii) In the order entered under subdivision
(e)(2)(F)(ii) of this section, the commission shall discuss:
(a) The basis for the commission’s findings;
and
(b) Any evidence or other information
submitted by the electric distribution cooperative or electric generation and
transmission cooperative with its amended filing that the commission finds
does not comply with specific provisions of this subchapter.
(G) The process outlined in subdivisions (e)(2)(B) and (F)
of this section may continue until the commission finds that:
(i) The electric distribution cooperative's or an
electric generation and transmission cooperative’s application complies with
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
this subchapter;
(ii) The electric distribution cooperative or the
electric generation and transmission cooperative withdraws its application;
or
(iii) The electric distribution cooperative or the
electric generation and transmission cooperative appeals the commission's
decision under § 23-2-423.
(H) If the commission fails to issue its order within the
time frames stated in this subchapter, the electric distribution
cooperative's or the electric generation and transmission cooperative’s
filing shall become effective by operation of law, subject to completion of
the commission’s review under this subchapter.
(f)(1) At the election of the electric distribution cooperative or the
electric generation and transmission cooperative, strategic investments shall
be recovered through the rider under this subchapter, separate from any rate
adjustments by an electric distribution cooperative under § 23-4-901 et seq.,
any rate adjustments by an electric generation and transmission cooperative
under § 23-4-1101 et seq., any other rider, or otherwise as part of the
electric distribution cooperative's or the electric generation and
transmission cooperative’s rates approved by the commission.
(2) If elected by an electric distribution cooperative or an
electric generation and transmission cooperative, the rider shall remain in
effect under this subchapter until the electric distribution cooperative or
the electric generation and transmission cooperative decides to withdraw the
rider with respect to future cost recovery for strategic investments to be
made after the date of the withdrawal.
(g) For the purposes of calculating rates to recover the costs of
strategic investments, including rates implemented through an individual
customer contract, the commission shall ensure that the rates charged to
customers recover the costs of strategic investments in a manner that is
consistent with applicable law and in the public interest.
(h)(1) An amount collected through the rider under this subchapter
shall be collected subject to refunds pending the completion of the
commission's review under this subchapter.
(2) At any time during the process, if the commission finds that
any costs were not prudently incurred, the commission shall order that the
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
costs that were not prudently incurred be refunded to customers through bill
credits.
(i) The rider elected by an electric distribution cooperative or an
electric generation and transmission cooperative under this subchapter to
recover strategic investments is a revenue requirement rider and shall
provide an electric distribution cooperative's or an electric generation and
transmission cooperative's approved times interest earned ratio, including
any amounts to build members equity, for the construction work in progress
during construction and return on rate base plus operating expenses once the
strategic investments are complete and in service.
(j)(1) An electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation
and transmission cooperative shall not accrue an allowance for funds used
during construction for strategic investments with costs recovered through
the rider.
(2) Instead the commission may allow an electric distribution
cooperative or an electric generation and transmission cooperative to adjust
its revenues through the rider under this subchapter to maintain its
authorized times interest earned ratio for expenditures associated with any
construction work in progress.
(k) The commission may allow an electric distribution cooperative or
an electric generation and transmission cooperative to recover through the
rider under this subchapter any expenses associated with the construction of
strategic investments that will not be capitalized.
(l) In calculating construction work in progress, including actual
costs and any projections, the electric distribution cooperative or the
electric generation and transmission cooperative shall base all amounts on
year-end information not subject to averaging beginning-of-year and end-of-
year balances.
(m) For the purposes of the rider under this subchapter, the electric
distribution cooperative's or the electric generation and transmission
cooperative’s times interest earned ratio shall be the times interest earned
ratio underlying its currently approved rates, including any additional
amounts to build equity of the members of the electric distribution
cooperative or the electric generation and transmission cooperative.
(n)(1) On the strategic investments' being complete and in service,
the commission shall authorize the electric distribution cooperative or the
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
electric generation and transmission cooperative to adjust its revenues
through the rider under this subchapter to maintain its authorized times
interest earned ratio for expenditures associated with any construction work
in progress costs that will ultimately be capitalized or recorded as
allowance for funds used during construction when the strategic investments
are complete and in service.
(2) Once the strategic investments are complete and in service,
the commission shall authorize the electric distribution cooperative or the
electric generation and transmission cooperative to recover through the rider
under this subchapter any on-going expenses associated with the strategic
investments.
(3) In the electric distribution cooperative's or the electric
generation and transmission cooperative’s next general rate case proceeding,
the commission shall allow the electric distribution cooperative or the
electric generation and transmission cooperative to include any capitalized
amounts and associated expenses for completed strategic investments in its
base rates.
(4)(A) In its next general rate case proceeding, the electric
distribution cooperative or the electric generation and transmission
cooperative shall move any amounts for any completed strategic investments
from the rider under this subchapter into its base rates.
(B) The electric distribution cooperative or the electric
generation and transmission cooperative shall continue to recover through the
rider under this subchapter the costs and expenses associated with any
strategic investments that are not complete and in service.
(o) The revenues from the rider under this subchapter shall be
included in calculating the allowed level of any rate increase for electric
distribution cooperative rate adjustments under § 23-4-901 et seq. or
electric generation and transmission cooperative rate adjustments under § 23-
4-1101 et seq. but shall otherwise be excluded from the revenues included in
electric distribution cooperative rate adjustments under § 23-4-901 et seq.
or electric generation and transmission cooperative rate adjustments under §
23-4-1101 et seq.
(p) The commission shall authorize an electric distribution
cooperative or an electric generation and transmission cooperative to
monetize or apply any tax credits or other tax incentives, including without
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
limitation investment tax credits and production tax credits, where possible
to reduce the cost of constructing or acquiring any strategic investments for
the benefit of members of the electric distribution cooperative or the
electric generation and transmission cooperative.
(q)(1) An electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation
and transmission cooperative shall seek federal funds and loan programs to
reduce the cost of constructing, acquiring, and financing strategic
investments if possible, appropriate, and available for the benefit of
members of the electric distribution cooperative or the electric generation
and transmission cooperative.
(2) If an electric distribution cooperative or an electric
generation and transmission cooperative requests and receives federal funding
to support constructing or acquiring strategic investments, the applicable
amount of federal funding shall be deducted from the value of the strategic
investments that are capitalized and recoverable through rates charged to
members of the electric distribution cooperative or the electric generation
and transmission cooperative.
(r) If an electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation
and transmission cooperative has revenues above its authorized times interest
earned ratio, the electric distribution cooperative or the electric
generation and transmission cooperative shall not be required to adjust rates
if the electric distribution cooperative or the electric generation and
transmission cooperative can demonstrate that it has plans to invest in
strategic investments that would qualify for recovery through the rider in
amounts equal to or greater than the amount above the authorized times
interest earned ratio.
(s) Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, this section does
not alter the powers and authority of the commission.
(t) A commission review of the expenditures associated with strategic
investments included in the rider under this subchapter, including evaluating
whether or not any costs or expenses are reasonable and prudently incurred,
shall be completed within twelve (12) calendar months after the date upon
which the electric distribution cooperative or the electric generation and
transmission cooperative provides notice that the strategic investments are
complete and in service.
(u) An expenditure associated with strategic investments for which an
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
application for approval is pending before the commission as of the effective
date of this subchapter shall be eligible for recovery through the rider
under this subchapter if:
(1) The costs are not otherwise included in rates approved by
the commission before the effective date of this subchapter; and
(2) The electric distribution cooperative or the electric
generation and transmission cooperative has an application pending that was
filed before the effective date of this subchapter for approval:
(A) To construct a power generation facility outside of
the state under § 23-18-104;
(B) To obtain a certificate of environmental compatibility
and public need under the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic
Protection Act, § 23-18-501 et seq.;
(C) To obtain a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under § 23-3-201 et seq.; or
(D) For any other application related to the siting or
prudence of the decision to invest in the new strategic investments; and
(4) The commission enters an order after January 1, 2025,
approving an application that was filed before the effective date of this
subchapter for approval:
(A) To construct a power generation facility outside of
the state under § 23-18-104;
(B) To obtain a certificate of environmental compatibility
and public need under the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic
Protection Act, § 23-18-501 et seq.;
(C) To obtain a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under § 23-3-201 et seq.; or
(D) For any other application related to the siting or
prudence of the decision to invest in the new strategic investments.
(v)(1) If a customer pays or multiple customers pay for a portion of
any strategic investments through a contribution in aid of construction or
through other form of payment, the strategic investments shall continue to be
considered strategic investments and classified as part of the electric
distribution cooperative's or the electric generation and transmission
cooperative’s retail assets and recoverable through the electric distribution
cooperative's or the electric generation and transmission cooperative’s
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
retail rates, either in the base rates of the electric distribution
cooperative or the electric generation and transmission cooperative, through
a rider under this subchapter, or rates otherwise approved by the commission.
(2)(A) A payment by a customer or customers for a portion of any
strategic investments through a contribution in aid of construction shall be
deducted from the cost of the strategic investments capitalized and recovered
through rates.
(B) A payment by a customer or customers through any other
forms of payment shall be recorded for ratemaking purposes when the strategic
investments are first included in rates and shall be recognized as payment
over a period not to exceed the life of the strategic investments in a manner
that provides comparable benefits for other customers over the life of the
strategic investments.

23-4-1307. Procedure to recover strategic investments through rider —
Electric distribution cooperative and electric generation and transmission
cooperative.
(a) An electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation and
transmission cooperative electing to file with the Arkansas Public Service
Commission a rider under this subchapter to recover strategic investments not
otherwise included in rates previously approved by the commission, may file
an application to implement the rider any time within twelve (12) months
after:
(1) A commission order approving an application under § 23-3-201
et seq. or the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic Protection Act, §
23-18-501 et seq., or a notice under § 23-18-104; or
(2) Any other application related to the siting or prudence of
the decision to invest in the strategic investments.
(b)(1) An electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation
and transmission cooperative shall file an annual update to the rider under
this subchapter to reflect the annual expenditures plus an update to any
projections included in the rider under this subchapter to recover strategic
investments.
(2) An electric distribution cooperative’s or an electric
generation and transmission cooperative’s recovery through the rider shall be
limited to the amounts identified by the electric distribution cooperative or
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
the electric generation and transmission cooperative in the proceeding in
which the commission approved the strategic investments unless a greater
amount is subsequently authorized by the commission.
(c) The annual update required under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall include the amounts stated in this section for strategic
investments following subsequent orders from the commission approving
strategic investments.
(d) An electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation and
transmission cooperative shall immediately notify the commission of any
significant delays or material changes in the construction schedule to
include any strategic investments that are abandoned before completion or for
which construction has been indefinitely suspended or material changes in
costs of any strategic investments recovered through the rider in this
subsection (d).
(e)(1) An electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation
and transmission cooperative shall remove from the rider under this
subchapter the cost of any strategic investments that are abandoned before
completion or for which construction has been indefinitely suspended unless
the commission determines, based on substantial evidence provided by the
electric distribution cooperative or the electric generation and transmission
cooperative, that:
(A) The costs were reasonable and prudently incurred at
the time those costs were incurred;
(B) Continued recovery through the rider under this
subchapter remains reasonable;
(C) The circumstance of the abandonment before completion
or indefinite construction suspension is reasonable; and
(D) Recovery of those costs is in the public interest.
(2) Upon removal of any costs for strategic investments that are
abandoned or for which construction has been indefinitely suspended, an
electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation and transmission
cooperative may seek recovery of those costs through rates if the commission
determines, based on substantial evidence provided by the electric
distribution cooperative or the electric generation and transmission
cooperative, that:
(A) The costs were reasonable and prudently incurred at
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
the time those costs were incurred;
(B) The circumstance of the abandonment before completion
or indefinite construction suspension is reasonable; and
(C) Recovery of those costs is in the public interest.
(3)(A) An electric distribution cooperative or an electric
generation and transmission cooperative may request recovery of any costs for
strategic investments that are abandoned before completion or for which
construction has been indefinitely suspended and that are removed from
recovery through the rider under this subchapter in a separate proceeding.
(B) The commission shall determine:
(i) Whether recovery of those costs is in the public
interest; and
(ii) The form and timing of recovery through rates
charged to customers.
(f)(1)(A) An electric distribution cooperative’s or an electric
generation and transmission cooperative’s total amount of revenue increase
from an annual update to the rider under this subchapter shall not result in
the electric distribution cooperative’s or the electric generation and
transmission cooperative’s rates exceeding a level ten percent (10%) below
the national average for all sectors calculated using the same method as that
used by the United States Energy Information Administration and published in
its most recent editions of the Electric Power Annual report for electric
public utilities as adopted by the commission by rule and calculated using
data from the same calendar year as the United States Energy Information
Administration publication to which the electric distribution cooperative's
or the electric generation and transmission cooperative’s revenue increase is
compared.
(B) If an electric distribution cooperative or an electric
generation and transmission cooperative provides substantial evidence
demonstrating that the electric distribution cooperative's or the electric
generation and transmission cooperative's rates will remain capable of
attracting or retaining economic development opportunities for the state even
if the rates exceed a level of ten percent (10%) below national average and
that doing so is in the public interest, then the commission shall approve
the revenue increase.
(2)(A) If the commission approves a revenue increase for an
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
electric distribution cooperative or an electric generation and transmission
cooperative from an annual update to the rider under this subchapter that
results in the electric distribution cooperative's or the electric generation
and transmission cooperative's rates exceeding a level ten percent (10%)
below the national average, the commission shall submit a letter to the
cochairs of the Legislative Council notifying the General Assembly that the
commission has approved a revenue increase for the electric distribution
cooperative or the electric generation and transmission cooperative from an
annual update to the rider under this subchapter that has resulted in the
electric distribution cooperative’s or the electric generation and
transmission cooperative’s total rates, inclusive of all riders, that exceeds
a level ten percent (10%) below the national average.
(B) Unless the commission approves an increase in the
total amount of revenue increase from an annual update to the rider under
this subchapter that exceeds a level ten percent (10%) below the national
average for all sectors under subdivision (g)(1)(A) of this section, the
electric distribution cooperative or the electric generation and transmission
cooperative shall adjust an annual update as required under subsections (a)—
(c) of this section to include only a revenue increase that results in rates
that are ten percent (10%) below the national average.
(C) The commission shall verify that an annual update to
the rider under subsections (a)—(c) of this section does not include a
revenue increase that results in rates exceeding a level ten percent (10%)
below the national average unless it authorizes a greater amount under
subdivision (f)(1)(A).
(g) The commission shall submit an annual report to the Legislative
Council describing the strategic investments included in the rider under this
subchapter for each electric distribution cooperative or electric generation
and transmission cooperative and indicating the change in rates resulting
from each electric distribution cooperative's or electric generation and
transmission cooperative's annual update to the rider under this subchapter
on the electric distribution cooperative's or the electric generation and
transmission cooperative’s rates.
(h)(1) Each electric distribution cooperative or electric generation
and transmission cooperative shall submit an annual report to the commission
describing the electric distribution cooperative or the electric generation
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
and transmission cooperative generation portfolio mix based on the generation
capacity mix and based on the energy mix.
(2) The commission shall submit an annual report to the
Legislative Council describing the generation portfolio mix based on the
generation capacity mix and based on the energy mix for an electric
distribution cooperative or an electric generation and transmission
cooperative.
(i) Once strategic investments in public utility facilities that are
complete and in service, an electric distribution cooperative or an electric
generation and transmission cooperative shall:
(1) Reconcile the actual expenditures and any projected amounts
included in the rider under this subchapter to recover strategic investments;
(2) Net any differences in projected amounts and actual
expenditures; and
(3) Either:
(A) Reduce the amounts ultimately capitalized by any over-
collection; or
(B) Recover any under-collection through subsequent years’
rider to recover strategic investments filings.
(j) For recovery through the rider, an electric distribution
cooperative or an electric generation and transmission cooperative shall give
priority to strategic investments in new electric generation and transmission
facilities located in Arkansas, unless:
(1) The electric distribution cooperative or the electric
generation and transmission cooperative demonstrates, and the commission
finds that a strategic investment in new electric generation and transmission
facilities located outside of Arkansas provides greater benefits to the
electric distribution cooperative's or an electric generation and
transmission cooperative’s customers in Arkansas than a comparable strategic
investment in new electric generation and transmission facilities located in
Arkansas;
(2) A comparable strategic investment in new electric generation
or transmission facility is not available or cannot be constructed in
Arkansas; or
(3) A customer or customers contract to pay all or a portion of
the cost of the strategic investment in the resource through a special rate
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
contract, a renewable rate schedule, a contribution in aid of construction,
or other form of payment.

23-4-1308. Recovery of advanced energy technologies and feasibility
studies under strategic investments rider — Definition.
(a)(1)(A) Upon a finding by the Arkansas Public Service Commission
that advanced energy technologies are in the public interest, a public
utility may elect to pursue strategic investments in the advanced energy
technologies and shall recover strategic investments in the advanced energy
technologies through the rider obtained under this subchapter after a
commission order approving an application under § 23-3-201 et seq. or § 23-
18-501 et seq., a notice under § 23-18-104, or any other application related
to the siting or prudence of the decision to invest in strategic investments.
(B) The commission may find that advanced energy
technologies are in the public interest under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
section by considering whether those advanced energy technologies are:
(i) Technically feasible;
(ii) Commercially and financially viable; and
(iii) Otherwise beneficial to customers in Arkansas.
(2)(A) A facility using advanced energy technologies that are in
use by a public utility in Arkansas to serve customers, including without
limitation nuclear generation or hydroelectric generation, pumped or run-of-
river, is not subject to subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section.
(B) A public utility may recover the costs of feasibility
studies and strategic investments in advanced energy technologies that are
currently being used or have been used by the public utility in Arkansas to
serve customers through a rider obtained under this subchapter.
(3) As used in this section, "advanced energy technologies"
includes without limitation:
(A) Modular nuclear reactors;
(B) New technologies for nuclear generation technologies;
(C) Hydrogen-fueled generation technologies;
(D) Geothermal generation technologies;
(E) Renewable natural gas technologies;
(F) Hydrogen technologies;
(G) Biomass generation technologies;
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(H) Hydroelectric generation technologies; and
(I) Emissions capture and sequestration equipment or
facilities associated with any new or existing major utility facility as
defined in the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic Protection Act, §
23-18-501 et seq., or other electric transmission facilities or natural gas
transmission facilities by a public utility that are:
(i) Required by state law or rule or federal
regulation;
(ii) Paid for in total or in part by a customer or
customers through a special rate contract, a contribution in aid of
construction, or other form of payment; or
(iii) Otherwise found by the commission to be in the
public interest.
(b) A public utility shall monitor and evaluate advancements in
modular nuclear reactors and other new nuclear generation technologies and
evaluate the resources as part of the public utility's resource planning once
those technologies become in the public interest considering without
limitation whether or not those technologies become technically feasible,
commercially and financially viable, and otherwise beneficial to customers in
Arkansas.
(c) For strategic investments approved by the commission, a public
utility may elect to, and upon election may recover strategic investments in
advanced energy technologies and feasibility studies through a rider under
this section.
(d)(1) Upon election by a public utility, the commission shall
authorize a public utility to recover the reasonable and prudently incurred
costs of studying the feasibility of advanced energy technologies, including
the cost of engineering and economic analyses to assess the technical,
financial, and commercial feasibility of implementing and using advanced
energy technologies to serve customers in Arkansas through the rider to
recover strategic investments under this section for feasibility studies of
advanced energy technologies associated with strategic investments that are
approved by the commission.
(2) For all other feasibility studies of advanced energy
technologies, the commission shall authorize a public utility to recover the
reasonable and prudently incurred cost of the feasibility study and shall
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
determine the form and timing of recovery through rates charged to customers.

23-4-1309. Authorization of special rate contracts.
(a)(1) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural
gas utility may enter into a special rate contract to serve a new or existing
customer location in Arkansas.
(2) If the Arkansas Public Service Commission finds that the
special rate contract under subdivision (a)(1) of this section is consistent
with the public interest, the commission shall enter an order approving the
special rate contract within ninety (90) days after an investor-owned
electric utility or an investor-owned natural gas utility files an
application for approval.
(3) If the commission finds that a special rate contract in the
application is inconsistent with the public interest under subdivision (b)(2)
of this section, the commission shall:
(A) Enter an order describing the provisions that are not
consistent with the public interest; and
(B) Provide an opportunity for the investor-owned electric
utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility to file an amended
application to remedy the identified insufficiencies.
(4)(A) If an investor-owned electric utility or an investor-
owned natural gas utility files an amended application remedying those
provisions, the commission shall enter an order approving the special rate
contract in the application within thirty (30) days after the investor-owned
electric utility's or the investor-owned natural gas utility's filing.
(B) If the commission determines that approving the
contract is inconsistent with the public interest, in its order denying
approval of the contract, the commission shall include a discussion of:
(i) The basis for the commission's findings; and
(ii) The specific evidence or information provided
by the investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural gas
utility as part of its application upon which the commission relied to reach
that conclusion in its order.
(C)(i) If an investor-owned electric utility or an
investor-owned natural gas utility submits additional evidence or other
information demonstrating that the contract is in the public interest, the
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
commission shall enter an order approving the contract within thirty (30)
days after its filing unless the commission determines that approving the
contract is inconsistent with the public interest.
(ii) If the commission determines that approving the
contract is inconsistent with the public interest, in its order denying
approval of the contract, the commission shall include a discussion of:
(a) The basis for the commission's findings;
and
(b) The specific evidence or information
provided by the investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned natural
gas utility as part of its application upon which the commission relied to
reach that conclusion in its order.
(iii) The process outlined in subdivision (a)(4) of
this section may continue until the commission finds that:
(a) Approving the contract is in the public
interest;
(b) The investor-owned electric utility or the
investor-owned natural gas utility withdraws its application; or
(c) The investor-owned electric utility or an
investor-owned natural gas utility appeals the commission's decision under §
23-2-423.
(b)(1) An investor-owned electric utility or an investor-owned natural
gas utility shall be authorized to develop and implement rates and other
contract provisions to recover all or part of the cost of any strategic
investments necessary to serve the customer as part of the special rate
contract if the investor-owned electric utility or the investor-owned natural
gas utility demonstrates that doing so is in the public interest.
(2) As part of a special rate contract, the investor-owned
electric utility or the investor-owned natural gas utility is authorized to
set forth customer rates and other contract terms attributable to all or part
of the cost of any strategic investments through various cost recovery
methods, including without limitation:
(A) A contribution in aid of construction;
(B) Any other contribution toward the cost of the
strategic investments;
(C) As part of the customer's monthly rate;
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(D) A customer prepayment or other charge;
(E) Prepaid allowance for funds used during construction;
or
(F) As part of a minimum bill provision.
(c) An electric cooperative corporation that is established under the
Electric Cooperative Corporation Act, § 23-18-301 et seq., including any
electric generation and transmission cooperative, may facilitate the recovery
of all or part of the cost in subsections (a) and (b) of this section through
one (1) or more riders under this subchapter.
(d) This section does not alter or diminish the commission’s authority
over an electric utility’s allocated service territory, including without
limitation where the commission has authorized an electric utility to serve
within a municipality, territorial district, or other geographic area.

23-4-1310. Authorization for alternative methods of financing.
(a) An electric utility or a natural gas utility may use alternative
methods of financing for the purpose of financing strategic investments under
this subchapter.
(b) The alternative methods of financing may include without
limitation:
(1) Sale-leaseback agreements;
(2) Third-party financing or customer financing; or
(3) Other methods of financing.
(c)(1) The Arkansas Public Service Commission shall not disallow,
impute alternative values, or adjust the financing under this section unless
the commission determines based on substantial evidence that:
(A) The financing is unreasonable;
(B) The costs are not prudently incurred; or
(C) The financing is detrimental to customers.
(2)(A) If an electric utility or a natural gas utility files
additional evidence or other information demonstrating that the financing is
reasonable and in the public interest, the commission shall enter an order
approving the financing within thirty (30) days after its filing if the
commission determines that approving the financing is consistent with the
public interest.
(B) If the commission determines that approving the
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
financing is inconsistent with the public interest, in its order denying
approval of the financing, the commission shall include a discussion of:
(i) The basis for the commission's findings; and
(ii) The specific evidence or information provided
by the electric utility or the natural gas utility as part of its application
upon which the commission relied to reach that conclusion in its order.
(C)(i) If an electric utility or a natural gas utility
submits additional evidence or other information demonstrating that the
financing is in the public interest, the commission shall enter an order
approving the contract within thirty (30) days after its filing unless the
commission determines that approving the financing is inconsistent with the
public interest.
(ii) If the commission determines that approving the
financing is inconsistent with the public interest, in its order denying
approval of the financing, the commission shall include a discussion of:
(a) The basis for the commission's findings;
and
(b) The specific evidence or information
provided by the electric utility or the natural gas utility as part of its
application upon which the commission relied to reach that conclusion in its
order.
(D) The process outlined in subdivision (c)(2) of this
section may continue until the commission finds that:
(i) Approving the financing is in the public
interest;
(ii) The electric utility or the natural gas utility
withdraws its application; or
(iii) The electric utility or the natural gas
utility appeals the commission's decision under § 23-3-423.

23-4-1311. Rules.
(a) The Arkansas Public Service Commission shall amend its rules as
required to implement and administer this subchapter.
(b) The commission shall initiate a proceeding to establish any new
rules or modify any existing rules necessary to administer this subchapter
and any other applicable exemptions under this subchapter.
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(c) The commission shall enter an order approving the rules necessary
to administer this subchapter before March 31, 2026.
(d) An electric public utility or a natural gas public utility shall
be authorized to file an application under this section after the effective
date of this act before the commission completes any modification to its
rules necessary to carry out this section.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 23-18-104 is amended to read as follows:
23-18-104. Construction of power-generating facilities outside the
state Arkansas.
(a) No Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section, an
electric public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Public
Service Commission shall not commence construction of any power-generating
electric generating facility that is a major utility facility to be located
outside the boundaries of this state without the express written approval of
the commission.
(b)(1) Any An electric public utility proposing such construction
shall render adequate written notice to the commission of its intent in order
that the commission may conduct any germane inspection, investigation, public
hearing, or take any other action deemed appropriate by the commission.
(2) An electric public utility or natural gas public utility
shall provide notice to the commission of its intent to recover any strategic
investments, as defined under § 23-4-1303, subject to the Generating Arkansas
Jobs Act of 2025, § 23-4-1301 et seq., as part of a public utility's notice
under this section or application to construct an electric generation
facility under this subchapter.
(c) Failure on the part of any electric public utility to obtain prior
approval of the commission, as established in this section, shall constitute
grounds for disallowance by the commission of all costs and expenses
associated with the construction and subsequent operation of the facility
when computing the electric public utility's cost of service for purposes of
any rate-making proceedings.
(d)(1) If the commission determines that approving an electric public
utility's application to construct an electric generating facility located
outside of Arkansas that is a major utility facility is consistent with the
public interest, the commission shall enter an order granting approval of the
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
electric public utility's application within six (6) months after the
electric public utility submits its notice of intent to construct electric
generating facilities under this section.
(2)(A) If the commission determines that granting approval of an
application to construct an electric generating facility located outside of
Arkansas that is a major utility facility is not in the public interest, the
commission shall enter an order.
(B) In the order entered by the commission under
subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section, the commission shall discuss:
(i) The basis for the commission's determination;
and
(ii) Any evidence or other information submitted by
the electric public utility as part of its notice or application upon which
that the commission relied to reach that determination.
(3)(A)(i) If an electric public utility submits additional
evidence or other information demonstrating that the construction of an
electric generating facility located outside of Arkansas that is a major
utility facility is reasonable, necessary, and in the public interest, then
the commission shall enter an order granting its approval within thirty (30)
days after the date of the electric public utility’s filing.
(ii)(a) If the commission finds that the electric
public utility’s filing fails to comply with this subchapter, the commission
shall enter an order.
(b) In the order entered by the commission
under subdivision (d)(3)(A)(ii)(a) of this section, the commission shall
discuss:
(1) The basis for the commission's
findings; and
(2) Any evidence or other information
submitted by the electric public utility as part of its notice or application
that the commission finds did not comply with this subchapter.
(B) The process described in subdivision (d)(2) of this
section and this subdivision (d)(3) may continue until the commission finds
that:
(i) The electric public utility’s application
complies with this subchapter;
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(ii) The electric public utility withdraws its
application; or
(iii) The electric public utility appeals the
commission's decision under § 23-2-423.
(d)(e) Any electric public utility which does not own in whole or in
part another electric public utility and which is not owned in whole or in
part by a holding company and which derives less than twenty-five percent
(25%) of its total revenues from Arkansas customers is exempt from the
provisions of this section.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 23-18-202, concerning the jurisdiction of
the Arkansas Public Service Commission, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(c) An approval shall not be required from the commission for
borrowings, loan contracts, notes, mortgages, or guarantees from other public
or private sources that have been approved by a majority of the board of
directors of an electric cooperative corporation formed under the Electric
Cooperative Corporation Act, § 23-18-301 et seq.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 23-18-502(a), concerning the legislative
findings under the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic Protection
Act, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(4) Furthermore, it is necessary to reform the certification
process for construction of major utility facilities under this subchapter to
expedite the certification process and reduce the regulatory and
administrative burdens associated with the certification process.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 23-18-503, concerning the definitions used
under the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic Protection Act, is
amended to add additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(16) "Gas transmission line" means a natural gas pipeline or
connected series of natural gas pipelines, other than a gathering line, that:
(A) Transports gas from a gathering pipeline or natural
gas storage facility to a distribution center or to a large volume customer
using similar volumes of gas as a distribution center and is not located
downstream from a distribution center;
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(B) Has a maximum allowable operating pressure of twenty
percent (20%) or more of specified minimum yield strength;
(C) Transports gas within a storage field; or
(D) Is voluntarily or otherwise designated by the operator
as a transmission pipeline; and
(17) "Strategic investments" means the same as defined in § 23-
4-1303.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 23-18-503(6), concerning the definition of
"major utility facility" under the Utility Facility Environmental and
Economic Protection Act, is amended to read as follows:
(6) “Major utility facility” means:
(A) An A single electric generating plant and associated
transportation and storage facilities for fuel and other facilities designed
for or capable of operation at a capacity of fifty megawatts (50 MW) or more;
(B) For the sole purpose of requiring an environmental
impact statement under this subchapter, an electric transmission line and
associated facilities including substations of:
(i) A design voltage of one hundred kilovolts (100
kV) or more and extending a distance of more than ten (10) miles; or
(ii) A design voltage of one hundred seventy
kilovolts (170 kV) or more and extending a distance of more than one (1)
mile; or
(C) For the sole purpose of requiring an environmental
impact statement under this subchapter, a A gas transmission line and
associated facilities designed for or capable of transporting gas at
pressures in excess of one hundred twenty-five pounds per square inch (125
psi) and extending a distance of more than one (1) mile five (5) miles except
gas pipelines devoted solely to the gathering of gas from gas wells
constructed within the limits of any gas field as defined by the Oil and Gas
Commission;

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 23-18-504(a), concerning exemptions for a
major utility facility under the Utility Facility Environmental and Economic
Protection Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) This subchapter does not apply to a major utility facility:
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(1)(A) That is located outside of Arkansas;
(B) For which, before July 24, 1973, an application for
the approval of the major utility facility was made to any federal, state,
regional, or local governmental agency that possesses the jurisdiction to
consider the matters prescribed for finding and determination in § 23-18-
519(a) and (b);
(2)(C) For which, before July 24, 1973, the Arkansas
Public Service Commission issued a certificate of convenience and necessity
or otherwise approved the construction of the major utility facility;
(3)(D) Over which an agency of the federal government has
exclusive jurisdiction;
(4)(E) A majority of which is owned by one (1) or more
exempt wholesale generators as defined in § 23-1-101(5);
(5)(F) That is a major utility facility for generating
electric energy, if the majority of the major utility facility is owned by
any person, including without limitation a public utility that will not
recover the cost of the major utility facility in rates subject to regulation
by the commission; or
(6)(G) That is a gas pipeline of less than five (5) miles
in length constructed:
(A)(i) Primarily for serving a single customer or a
group of customers that is under common ownership or control;
(B)(ii) For use by the customer or group of
customers that have entered into a lease to facilitate the issuance of bonds
under Title 14, Chapter 164 of this Code; and
(C)(iii) Entirely on land:
(i)(a) Owned by the customer or group of
customers to be served; or
(ii)(b) Leased by the customer or group of
customers to be served.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 23-18-508 is amended to read as follows:
23-18-508. Rules.
(a) The Arkansas Public Service Commission shall have and is granted
the power and authority to make and amend from time to time after reasonable
notice and hearing reasonable rules establishing exemptions from some or all
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
of the requirements of this subchapter for the construction, reconstruction,
or expansion of any major utility facility which is unlikely to have major
adverse environmental or economic impact by reason of length, size, location,
available space, or right-of-way on or adjacent to existing utility
facilities, and similar reasons.
(b) The commission shall:
(1) Initiate a proceeding to modify any existing rules necessary
to administer this subchapter and any other applicable exemptions under this
subchapter; and
(2) Enter an order modifying any existing rules on or before
March 31, 2026.
(c) An electric or natural gas public utility shall be authorized to
file an application under this section after the effective date of this act
before the commission completes any modification of its rules necessary to
carry out this section.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 23-18-510 is amended to read as follows:
23-18-510. Certificate of environmental compatibility and public need
— Requirement — Exceptions.
(a)(1) Except for persons exempted as provided in subsection (c) of
this section and § 23-18-504(a) and § 23-18-508, a person shall not begin
construction of a major utility facility in the state without first obtaining
a certificate of environmental compatibility and public need for the major
utility facility from the Arkansas Public Service Commission.
(2)(A) The replacement, reconfiguration, or expansion of an
existing transmission facility with a similar facility in substantially the
same location or the rebuilding, upgrading, modernizing, or reconstruction
for the purposes of increasing capacity or reusing a generation or
transmission interconnection shall not constitute construction of a major
utility facility if no increase in width of right-of-way is required.
(B) In the instance of a generation facility that would
meet the requirements of subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section but for an
increase in the width of the right-of-way caused by replacement,
reconfiguration, or expansion of a transmission or related facility, the
commission shall consider the generation facility separately from any
transmission or related facilities to be under separate construction.
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(b)(1) An entity, including without limitation a person, public
utility, utility, regional transmission organization, municipality, merchant
transmission provider, merchant generator, or other entity, whether regulated
or not by the commission, shall not begin construction of an electric
transmission line and associated facilities, as described in § 23-18-
503(6)(B), within a national interest electric transmission corridor without
first obtaining a certificate of environmental compatibility and public need
for the facility from the commission.
(2) An electric public utility or a natural gas public utility
shall provide notice to the commission of its intent to construct to recover
any strategic investments, as defined under § 23-4-1303, subject to the
Generating Arkansas Jobs Act of 2025, § 23-4-1301 et seq., as part of a
public utility's application under the Utility Facility Environmental and
Economic Protection Act, § 23-18-501 et seq.
(c) This subchapter does not require a certificate of environmental
compatibility and public need or an amendment of such a certificate for:
(1) Reconstruction, alteration, or relocation of a major utility
facility that must be reconstructed, altered, or relocated because of the
requirements of a federal, state, or county governmental body or agency for
purposes of highway transportation, public safety, or air and water quality;
or
(2) An electric transmission line and associated facilities
including substations of a design voltage of one hundred kilovolts (100 kV)
or more to be constructed or operated by a municipal electric utility system
that is located within the territorial limits of the municipal electric
utility system.
(d) An entity granted a certificate of environmental compatibility and
public need pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall have the right
of eminent domain as provided by Arkansas law for the limited purpose of
constructing the certificated electric transmission line and associated
facilities, as described in § 23-18-503(6)(B), to the extent that the
facility is located within a national interest electric transmission
corridor.
(e)(1) Strategic investments in major utility facilities under § 23-
18-503(6)(A) located on the same or adjacent property or in the same rights-
of-way or adjacent rights-of-way by a public utility are exempt from this
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
subchapter but shall be subject to the requirements of § 23-3-201 et seq.
(2) The purchase of a major utility facility constructed by a
third party for that third party, upon completion of construction or at any
time after completion of construction, by a public utility is exempt from
this subchapter but shall be subject to the requirements of § 23-3-201 et
seq.
(3) Except as provided in this section, this section does not
alter the powers and authority of the commission.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 23-18-513 is amended to read as follows:
23-18-513. Application for certificate — Service or notice of
application.
(a) Each public utility filing an application for a certificate of
environmental compatibility and public need shall be accompanied by proof of
service of a copy of the application on provide notice of its application as
the Arkansas Public Service Commission may require.
(b) Each application submitted under subsection (a) of this section
shall be accompanied by proof of notice of the application to:
(1) The mayor of each municipality;
(2) The county judge;
(3) The chair of the county planning board, if any;
(4) Any head of a governmental agency charged with the duty of
protecting the environment or of planning land use, upon which the Arkansas
Public Service Commission has by rule or order directed that service be made,
in the area in which any portion of such facility is to be located, both as
primarily and as alternatively proposed;
(5) Each member of the General Assembly in whose district the
facility or any alternative location listed in the application is to be
located;
(6) The office of the Governor; and
(7) The director or other administrative head of the following
state agencies or departments:
(A) Division of Environmental Quality;
(B) Department of Health;
(C) Arkansas Economic Development Commission;
(D) Arkansas Department of Transportation;
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(E) Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;
(F) Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission;
(G) Any state agency which may have the authority to
assist in financing the applicant's facility;
(H) Any other state agency or department which manages or
has jurisdiction over state-owned lands on which all or part of the proposed
utility facility is to be or may be located;
(I) Department of Finance and Administration;
(J) State Energy Conservation and Policy Office
[abolished];
(K) The office of the Attorney General; and
(L)(K) Any other state agency or department designated by
Arkansas Public Service Commission rule or order; and
(8) Proof that a copy of the application has been made available
for public inspection at all public libraries in each county in which the
proposed utility facility is to be or may be located.
(b)(c) The copy of the application shall be accompanied by a notice
specifying the date on or about which the application is to be filed and a
notice that interventions or limited appearances must be filed with the
Arkansas Public Service Commission within thirty (30) days after the date set
forth as the date of filing, unless good cause is shown pursuant to § 23-18-
517.
(c)(1)(d)(1) Each application shall also be accompanied by proof that
written notice specifying the date on or about which the application is to be
filed and the date that interventions or limited appearances must be filed
with the Arkansas Public Service Commission, unless good cause is shown
pursuant to § 23-18-517, has been sent by certified mail to each owner of
real property on the proposed route selected by the public utility on which a
major utility facility is to be located or constructed.
(2) The written notice required by this subsection shall be
directed to the address of the owner of the real property as it appears on
the records in the office of the county sheriff or county tax assessor for
the mailing of statements for taxes as provided in § 26-35-705.
(d)(1)(e) Each application shall also be accompanied by proof that
public notice of the application was given to persons residing in
municipalities and counties entitled to receive notice under subsection (a)
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
(b) of this section by the publication in a newspaper having substantial
circulation in the municipalities or counties of:
(A)(1) A summary of the application;
(B)(2) A statement of the date on or about which it is to be
filed; and
(C)(3) A statement that intervention or limited appearances
shall be filed with the Arkansas Public Service Commission within thirty (30)
days after the date stated in the notice, unless good cause is shown under §
23-18-517.
(2)(A)(4) For purposes of this subsection, an environmental
impact statement submitted as an exhibit to the application need not be
summarized, but the published notice shall include a statement that the
impact statements are on file at the office of the Arkansas Public Service
Commission and available for public inspection or are available
electronically on the Arkansas Public Service Commission's website.
(B) The applicant shall also cause copies of the
environmental impact statement to be furnished to at least one (1) of its
local offices, if any, in the counties in which any portion of the major
utility facilities are to be located, both as primarily or as alternatively
proposed, to be there available for public inspection.
(C) The published notice shall contain a statement of the
location of the local offices described in subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this
section and the times the impact statements will be available for public
inspection.
(e)(f) Inadvertent failure of service on or notice to any of the
municipalities, counties, governmental agencies, or persons identified in
subsections (a) and (c) (b) and (d) of this section may be cured pursuant to
orders of the Arkansas Public Service Commission designed to afford such
persons adequate notice to enable their effective participation in the
proceedings.
(f)(g) In addition, after filing, the Arkansas Public Service
Commission may require the applicant to serve notice of the application or
copies thereof, or both, upon such other persons and file proof thereof, as
the Arkansas Public Service Commission may deem appropriate.
(g)(h) Where any personal service or notice is required in this
section, the service may be made by any officer authorized by law to serve
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
process, by personal delivery, or by certified mail.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 23-18-514 is repealed.
23-18-514. Application for certificate — Commentary by state agencies
— Deficiency letters.
(a)(1) Promptly after the filing of an application for a certificate
of environmental compatibility and public need, the staff of the Arkansas
Public Service Commission shall invite comments from all state agencies
entitled to service under § 23-18-513 as to the adequacy of applicant's
statements.
(2) The invitation to comment shall advise the state agencies
that comments must be received within sixty (60) days of the date of mailing
or delivery thereof, unless an agency requests for cause a longer period for
consideration.
(b)(1) Upon review of the comments, if any, if the staff shall
determine that the applicant failed to include or adequately develop any
relevant environmental or economic aspect of the facility, it shall issue a
deficiency letter pointing out in detail all such specific deficiencies in
the statements.
(2) The deficiency letter shall be prepared and served upon the
applicant as promptly as possible and in no event later than twenty (20) days
before the date set for the public hearing.
(3) The applicant shall promptly respond to any deficiency
letter, and the public hearing shall be deferred unless the applicant has
responded prior thereto to any deficiency letter.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 23-18-516(a)(1), concerning hearings on
applications or amendments, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Upon receipt of an application complying with §§ 23-18-511 —
23-18-514 23-18-513, the Arkansas Public Service Commission shall promptly
fix a date for the commencement of a public hearing thereon, which date shall
be not fewer than forty (40) days nor more than one hundred eighty (180)
ninety (90) days after the receipt of the application, and shall conclude the
proceedings as expeditiously as practicable.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 23-18-517(a), concerning parties to
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
certification proceedings, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The parties to a certification proceeding shall include:
(1) The applicant; or
(2) Each municipality, county, and government agency or
department or other person entitled to receive service of a copy of the
application under § 23-18-513(a) if it has filed with the Arkansas Public
Service Commission a notice of intervention as a party within thirty (30)
days after service; or
(3) A person residing in a municipality or county that is
entitled to receive service of a copy of the application under § 23-18-513(a)
or any domestic nonprofit corporation formed in whole or in part to promote
conservation or natural beauty, to promote energy conservation, to protect
the environment, personal health, or other biological values, to represent
commercial and industrial groups, or to promote the orderly development of
the areas in which the facility is to be located if the:
(A) Person or organization has an interest that may be
directly affected by the commission's action;
(B) Interest is not adequately represented by other
parties; and
(C) Person A person as defined under § 23-1-101(8) or
corporation that has petitioned the commission for leave to intervene as a
party within thirty (30) days after the date given in the public notice as
the date of filing the application.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 23-18-519(a), concerning decisions of the
Arkansas Public Service Commission and modifications of applications, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Arkansas Public Service Commission shall render a decision
upon the record either granting or denying the application as filed or
granting it upon such terms, conditions, or modifications of the location,
financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of the major utility
facility as the commission may deem appropriate.
(2) The record may include by reference the findings of the
commission in an energy resource declaration-of-need proceeding that the
utility needs additional energy supply resources or transmission resources.
(3)(A) If the commission determines that granting a certificate
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
of environmental compatibility and public need is in the public interest, it
shall enter an order granting a certificate of environmental compatibility
and public need within six (6) months after the receipt of the application.
(B)(i) If the commission determines that granting a
certificate of environmental compatibility and public need is not in the
public interest, it shall enter an order.
(ii) An order entered under subdivision (a)(3)(B)(i)
of this section shall discuss:
(a) The basis for the commission's findings;
and
(b) Any evidence upon which the commission
relied to reach that conclusion in its order.
(C)(i) If a public utility submits additional evidence
demonstrating that the strategic investments in major utility facilities that
are subject to this subchapter are reasonable, necessary, and in the public
interest, the commission shall enter an order granting the certificate within
thirty (30) days after the date of the public utility’s filing unless the
commission finds that the strategic investments subject to this subchapter
are not reasonable, necessary, or in the public interest.
(ii) An order entered under subdivision (a)(3)(C)(i)
of this section shall discuss:
(a) The basis for the commission's findings;
and
(b) Any evidence or other information upon
which the commission relied to reach that conclusion in its order.
(iii) The process outlined in subdivision (a)(3)(B)
of this section and this subdivision (a)(3)(C) may continue until the
commission finds that:
(a) The strategic investments subject to this
subchapter are reasonable, necessary, and in the public interest;
(b) The public utility withdraws its
application; or
(c) The public utility appeals the
commission's decision under § 23-2-423.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 23-18-521 is amended to read as follows:
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307
23-18-521. Issuance of certificate — Effect.
(a) A certificate to construct and operate a major utility facility
may be issued only under this subchapter unless a certificate is not required
under § 23-18-510(c) or 23-18-510(e).
(b)(1) A certificate issued under this subchapter to an applicant is
in lieu of and exempts the applicant from the requirements of obtaining a
certificate of convenience and necessity under § 23-3-201 et seq.
(2) A certificate issued under this subchapter entitles the
applicant to a permit under § 23-3-501 et seq. without any further notice or
hearing if the applicant has filed with the Arkansas Public Service
Commission the consent or authorization required by § 23-3-504(7) and paid
the damages stated in § 23-3-501 et seq.
(c) If the applicant is a corporation, before a certificate can be
issued under § 23-18-519, a certified copy of the articles of incorporation
or charter shall be on file with the commission.

SECTION 31. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that significant investment in
electric public utility infrastructure and natural gas public utility
infrastructure is required to enable this state to attract and serve economic
development projects across a variety of industries, as well as to continue
reliably supporting existing and new customers; that these economic
development projects and the continued provision of reliable electric utility
services and natural gas utility services are essential to the future of this
state; and that this act is immediately necessary because strategic
investments in electric public utility infrastructure and natural gas public
utility infrastructure support the development of sites available for
economic development projects. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.
03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB307

/s/J. Dismang


































03-11-2025 17:15:03 ANS209